Utah statutes.
59-10-1312.   Election Campaign Fund -- Creation -- Funding for account -- Disbursement and distribution -- State treasurer requirement to provide a list of contributions designated to each political party.

(1) (a)  As used in this section, "fund" means the Election Campaign Fund created by this section.

(b)  There is created an agency fund known as the "Election Campaign Fund."

(c)  The fund shall consist of all amounts deposited to the fund in accordance with Section 59-10-1311.

(2) On or before four months after the due date for filing a return required by this chapter in which a contribution is made in accordance with Section 59-10-1311, the state treasurer shall:

(a)  disburse that portion of the amounts deposited in the fund since the last disbursement:

(i)  that are designated for a political party; and

(ii)  to the political party to which the amounts are designated; and

(b)  provide to the political party described in Subsection (2)(a)(ii) a list disclosing, for each county, the total amount designated by resident or nonresident individuals, other than nonresident aliens, in that county.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 389, 2008 General Session

